District of Columbia statutes.
32-1527

Witness fees.

Witnesses summoned in a proceeding before the Mayor or whose depositions are taken shall receive the same fees and mileage as witnesses in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 28, 27 DCR 2503

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-327.